Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.294

Office of military and veteran legal assistance—Grants, gifts, donations.

The attorney general may apply for and receive grants, gifts, donations, bequests, or other contributions to help support and to be used exclusively for the operations of the office of military and veteran legal assistance.

[ 2017 c 163 s 3.]